Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB903.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 58AALCOHOL AND OTHER DRUG ADDICTIONCONTINUING EDUCATIONSec.58A01. Definitions.58A02. Alcohol and other drug addiction continuing education.§ 58A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Licensee." Any of the following:123456789101112131415161718 (1) A physician as the term is defined under section 902 of the act of March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act.(2) A physician assistant as the term is defined in section 2 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, or in section 2 of the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act.(3) A registered nurse as defined in 49 Pa. Code § 21.1 (relating to definitions).(4) A certified registered nurse practitioner as the term is defined in section 2 of the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law.(5) An individual licensed to practice as a licensed practical nurse under the provisions of the act of March 2, 1956 (1955 P.L.1211, No.376), known as the Practical Nurse Law."Licensing boards." The following:(1) The State Board of Medicine.(2) The State Board of Nursing.(3) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine."Warm handoff." The protocol developed by each single county authority on drugs and alcohol under the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs' guidelines that, after medical stabilization, provides for referral and transfer of individuals from emergency medical care to specialty substance use disorder treatment.§ 58A02. Alcohol and other drug addiction continuing education.(a) Continuing education requirements.--Beginning with licensure or certification periods that are active on or commence on November 1, 2025, and maintained for all subsequent 20250SB0903PN1022 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license or certification renewal periods, each licensing board shall implement a continuing education program on alcohol and other drug addiction to be completed by each licensee applying for license renewal with the respective licensing board. The continuing education shall consist of no less than 10 hours of educational material, counted as a portion of the total continuing education required for renewal, and shall include all of the following:(1) Early warning signs of alcohol and other drug addiction identification and referral skills.(2) Training on utilization of the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs' warm handoff procedures developed and maintained by each single county authority on drugs and alcohol.(3) Appropriate use of support groups for affected individuals and for the families of affected individuals.(b) Completion required.--Each licensing board shall require each licensee applying for a license or certification renewal to present evidence of completion of the continuing education specified in subsection (a) as a condition of renewal.(c) Exemption.--A licensee shall be exempt from the provisions of this section if any of the following conditions are met:(1) The licensee holds a current temporary training license.(2) The licensee is retired and only provides care to immediate family members.(d) Waiver.--A licensing board may waive all or a portion of the continuing education requirements specified in subsection (a) for license or certification renewal to a licensee who 20250SB0903PN1022 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 demonstrates to the satisfaction of the licensing board that the licensee was unable to complete the requirements due to serious illness, military service or other demonstrated hardship. A waiver request shall be made in writing, with appropriate documentation, and shall include a description of circumstances sufficient to show why compliance is impossible. The licensing board shall evaluate each waiver request on a case-by-case basis. The licensing board shall send written notification of its approval or denial of a waiver request to the licensee.(e) Other license renewal requirements.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to remove or alter any continuing education or other license or certification renewal requirements currently implemented and enforced by licensing boards.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0903PN1022 - 4 - 1234567891011121314